North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 4. Miscellaneous.

§ 55-14-40.
Disposition of amounts due to unavailable shareholders and creditors.

Upon liquidation of a corporation, the portion of the assets distributable to a creditor or shareholder who is unknown or cannot be found shall be disposed of in accordance with Chapter 116B.

History.

1947, c. 613; c. 621, s. 1; G.S., s. 55-132; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1971, c. 1135, s. 4; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 6; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.